Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-396
Unborn child, defined.

For purposes of the Assault of an Unborn Child Act, unborn child means an individual member of the species Homo sapiens at any stage of development in utero.

Laws 2006, LB 57, § 3.